New Jersey, session 222, A2598.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.18A:35-7, N.J.S.18A:35-8, or any other law to the contrary, a public high school student in tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade who meets the criteria enumerated in paragraph (2) of this subsection, participates in a school-sponsored sport, and is scheduled to attend a physical education course during the athletic season of that sport may elect to substitute the physical education course with a study hall during that athletic season.  The students participation in the sport shall count towards the students physical education requirement for graduation, and the student shall receive the number of high school graduation credits equal to the number received for completion of the physical education course. Each school district shall develop a policy to allow eligible students to substitute a physical education course with a study hall in accordance with this section. (2) A public high school student may only elect to substitute a physical education course with a study hall pursuant to this subsection if the student is: enrolled in at least one advanced placement course, a dual enrollment program, or other college-level course; or in need of additional academic support due to low academic performance indicators, as determined by the school district. b. (1)  The parent or guardian of a student seeking to substitute a physical education course with a study hall pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall provide the school district with written approval for the substitution. (2) The coach of the school-sponsored sport shall certify to the school district the students participation in the sport. (3) The students school counselor shall certify to the school district that the student is eligible to substitute a physical education course with a study hall pursuant to this section and that the counselor approves of the substitution. c. The school district shall determine for purposes of this section which school athletic activities constitute a school-sponsored sport. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the 2024-2025 school year.